Arkansas, session 2025, HB1957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-88-601 is amended to read as follows:
4-88-601. Title.
This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Unsolicited
Commercial and Sexually Explicit Electronic Mail and Text Message Prevention
Act”.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-88-602(10)(A)(i), concerning the
definition of "preexisting business relationship" under the Unsolicited
Commercial and Sexually Explicit Electronic Mail Prevention Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(10)(A)(i) “Preexisting business relationship” means that there
was a business transaction or communication between the sender and the
recipient of a commercial electronic mail or text message during the five-
*LJH075*
04-09-2025 14:29:15 LJH075

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1957
year period preceding the receipt of that message.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-88-602(12), concerning the definition of
"unsolicited" under the Unsolicited Commercial and Sexually Explicit
Electronic Mail Prevention Act, is amended to read as follows:
(12) “Unsolicited” means without the recipient's express
permission, except that commercial electronic mail or text message is not
unsolicited if the sender has a preexisting business or personal relationship
with the recipient.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-88-602, concerning definitions under the
Unsolicited Commercial and Sexually Explicit Electronic Mail Prevention Act,
is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(13) "Phone service provider" means a person who:
(A) Is an intermediary in the transmission of a text
message from the sender to the recipient; or
(B) Provides to end users of text message services via a
telephone number the ability to send and receive text messages;
(14) "Text message" means a message consisting of text, images,
sounds, or other information that is transmitted to or from a device that is
identified as the receiving or transmitting device by means of a ten (10)
digit telephone number;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 4-88-603 is amended to read as follows:
4-88-603. Unsolicited commercial or sexually explicit electronic mail
or text message — Requirements.
(a) Each person who sends or causes to be sent an unsolicited
commercial electronic mail or text message or an unsolicited sexually
explicit electronic mail or text message through the intermediary of an
electronic mail service provider or to an electronic mail address or phone
number held by a resident of the state shall:
(1)(A) Conspicuously For a commercial message to an electronic
mail address, conspicuously state in the electronic mail the sender's:
(A)(i) Legal name;
(B)(ii) Correct street address; and
(C)(iii) Valid internet domain name; and
04-09-2025 14:29:15 LJH075

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1957
(B) For a commercial text message, conspicuously state
the:
(i) Person from whom the text message originates;
(ii) Purpose of the text message; and
(iii) Ability to opt out and method of opting out of
receiving further text messages from the person;
(2) For a sexually explicit electronic mail, include in the
electronic mail a subject line that contains “adv:adult” as the first nine
(9) characters;
(3) Provide the recipient a convenient, no-cost mechanism to
notify the sender not to send any future electronic mail to the recipient,
including:
(A) Return electronic mail to a valid, functioning return
electronic address; and
(B) For a sexually explicit electronic mail and if the sender
has a toll-free telephone number, the sender's toll-free telephone number;
and
(4) Conspicuously provide in the text of the electronic mail a
notice:
(A) That informs the recipient that the recipient may
conveniently and at no cost be excluded from future commercial or sexually
explicit electronic mail, as the case may be, from the sender; and
(B) For sexually explicit electronic mail, if the sender has
a toll-free telephone number, that includes the sender's valid, toll-free
telephone number that the recipient may call to be excluded from future
electronic mail from the sender.
(b)(1) A commercial electronic mail or text message is not unsolicited
if the sender has a preexisting business or personal relationship with the
recipient.
(2) The sender of a commercial electronic mail or text message
of this nature must still include in the electronic mail message or text
message the required disclosures set forth in subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) of
this section and shall remove the recipient from future mailings or text
messages if requested.
(c) A person who sends or causes to be sent an unsolicited commercial
electronic mail or an unsolicited sexually explicit electronic mail through
04-09-2025 14:29:15 LJH075

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1957
the intermediary of an electronic mail service provider located in the state
or to an electronic mail address held by a resident of the state may shall
not:
(1) Use a third party's internet domain name in identifying the
point of origin or in stating the transmission path of the electronic mail
without the third party's consent;
(2) Misrepresent any information in identifying the point of
origin or the transmission path of the electronic mail; or
(3) Fail to include in the electronic mail the information
necessary to identify the point of origin of the electronic mail.
(d)(1) If the recipient of an unsolicited commercial electronic mail
or text message or an unsolicited sexually explicit electronic mail or text
message notifies the sender that the recipient does not want to receive
future commercial electronic mail or text message or future sexually explicit
electronic mail or text message from the sender, the sender may not send that
recipient a commercial electronic mail or text message or a sexually explicit
electronic mail or text message either directly or through a subsidiary or
affiliate.
(2) If a recipient has requested to be removed from future
mailings or text messages, the sender may recontact the recipient if a
preexisting business relationship has been reestablished or if the recipient
has expressly requested to receive future mailings or text messages from the
sender.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 4-88-604 is amended to read as follows:
4-88-604. Interactive computer service, and electronic mail service
provider, and phone service provider authority.
(a) An interactive computer service, or electronic mail service
provider, or phone service provider may block the receipt or transmission
through its service of any bulk electronic mail or text message that it
reasonably believes is or will be sent in violation of this subchapter.
(b) An interactive computer service, or electronic mail service
provider, or phone service provider is not:
(1) In violation of this section and the injured party shall not
have a cause of action against an interactive computer service, or electronic
mail service provider, or phone service provider due to the fact that the
04-09-2025 14:29:15 LJH075

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1957
interactive computer service, or electronic mail service provider, or phone
service provider:
(A) Is an intermediary between the sender and recipient in
the transmission of an electronic mail or text message that violates this
section; or
(B) Provides transmission of unsolicited commercial
electronic mail messages or text messages over the provider's computer
network or facilities; or
(2) Liable for any action it voluntarily takes in good faith to
block the receipt or transmission through its service of any electronic mail
or text message advertisements that it believes is or will be sent in
violation of this subchapter.
(c) An interactive computer service may disconnect or terminate the
service of any person who is in violation of this subchapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 4-88-606 is amended to read as follows:
4-88-606. Civil action for violation — Election on damages — Costs and
attorney's fees — Defense.
(a) For any violation of a provision of this subchapter, an action may
be brought by:
(1) A person who received the unsolicited commercial electronic
mail or text message or unsolicited sexually explicit electronic mail or text
message that violates this subchapter; or
(2) An electronic mail service provider or phone service
provider through whose facilities the unsolicited commercial electronic mail
or text message or unsolicited sexually explicit electronic mail or text
message was transmitted.
(b)(1) In each action under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a
recipient or electronic mail service provider or phone service provider may
elect, in lieu of actual damages, to recover the lesser of:
(A) Ten dollars ($10.00) per unsolicited commercial
electronic mail or text message or unsolicited sexually explicit electronic
mail or text message sent to a previously opted-out electronic mail address
or phone number or transmitted through the electronic mail service provider
or phone service provider or otherwise sent in violation of this subchapter;
or
04-09-2025 14:29:15 LJH075

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1957
(B) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day the
violation occurs.
(2) Each prevailing recipient or electronic mail service
provider or phone service provider shall be awarded costs and reasonable
attorney's fees.
(c) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this subchapter if
a person can demonstrate that the sender at the time of the alleged violation
had:
(1) Maintained a list of consumers who have notified the person
not to send any subsequent commercial electronic messages or text messages;
(2) Established and implemented with due care and reasonable
practices and procedures to effectively prevent unsolicited commercial
electronic mail messages or text messages in violation of this subchapter;
(3) Trained the sender's personnel in the requirements of this
subchapter; and
(4) Maintained records demonstrating compliance with this
subchapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 4-88-607(a)(1), concerning the transmission
of unsolicited commercial or sexually explicit electronic mail being
considered an unfair and deceptive act or practice, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) Any transmission of unsolicited commercial or sexually explicit
electronic mail or text message in violation of this subchapter shall
constitute an unfair and deceptive act or practice under § 4-88-107.

/s/S. Meeks









04-09-2025 14:29:15 LJH075